Illinois, session 104th, HB5160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The State Authorized Charter School Fund. 8    Section 10. The School Code is amended by changing Section 927A-11.5 as follows: 10    (105 ILCS 5/27A-11.5)11    Sec. 27A-11.5. State financing. The State Board shall make 12the following funds available to school districts and charter 13schools:14        (1) From a separate appropriation made to the State 15    Board for purposes of this subdivision (1), the State 16    Board shall make transition impact aid available to school 17    districts that approve a new charter school. The amount of 18    the aid shall equal 90% of the per capita funding paid to 19    the charter school during the first year of its initial 20    charter term, 65% of the per capita funding paid to the 21    charter school during the second year of its initial term,   HB5160- 2 -LRB104 17627 LNS 31058 b1    and 35% of the per capita funding paid to the charter 2    school during the third year of its initial term. This 3    transition impact aid shall be paid to the local school 4    board in equal quarterly installments, with the payment of 5    the installment for the first quarter being made by August 6    1st immediately preceding the first, second, and third 7    years of the initial term. The district shall file an 8    application for this aid with the State Board in a format 9    designated by the State Board. If the appropriation is 10    insufficient in any year to pay all approved claims, the 11    impact aid shall be prorated. If any funds remain after 12    these claims have been paid, then the State Board may pay 13    all other approved claims on a pro rata basis. Transition 14    impact aid shall be paid for charter schools that are in 15    the first, second, or third year of their initial term. 16    Transition impact aid shall not be paid for any charter 17    school that is proposed and created by one or more boards 18    of education, as authorized under subsection (b) of 19    Section 27A-7.20        (2) From a separate appropriation made for the purpose 21    of this subdivision (2), the State Board shall make grants 22    to charter schools to pay their start-up costs of 23    acquiring educational materials and supplies, textbooks, 24    electronic textbooks and the technological equipment 25    necessary to gain access to and use electronic textbooks, 26    furniture, and other equipment or materials needed during   HB5160- 3 -LRB104 17627 LNS 31058 b1    their initial term. The State Board shall annually 2    establish the time and manner of application for these 3    grants, which shall not exceed $250 per student enrolled 4    in the charter school.5        (3) The Charter Schools Revolving Loan Fund is created 6    as a special fund in the State treasury. Federal funds, 7    such other funds as may be made available for costs 8    associated with the establishment of charter schools in 9    Illinois, and amounts repaid by charter schools that have 10    received a loan from the Charter Schools Revolving Loan 11    Fund shall be deposited into the Charter Schools Revolving 12    Loan Fund, and the moneys in the Charter Schools Revolving 13    Loan Fund shall be appropriated to the State Board and 14    used to provide interest-free loans to charter schools. 15    These funds shall be used to pay start-up costs of 16    acquiring educational materials and supplies, textbooks, 17    electronic textbooks and the technological equipment 18    necessary to gain access to and use electronic textbooks, 19    furniture, and other equipment or materials needed in the 20    initial term of the charter school and for acquiring and 21    remodeling a suitable physical plant, within the initial 22    term of the charter school. Loans shall be limited to one 23    loan per charter school and shall not exceed $750 per 24    student enrolled in the charter school. A loan shall be 25    repaid by the end of the initial term of the charter 26    school. The State Board may deduct amounts necessary to   HB5160- 4 -LRB104 17627 LNS 31058 b1    repay the loan from funds due to the charter school or may 2    require that the local school board that authorized the 3    charter school deduct such amounts from funds due the 4    charter school and remit these amounts to the State Board, 5    provided that the local school board shall not be 6    responsible for repayment of the loan. The State Board may 7    use up to 3% of the appropriation to contract with a 8    non-profit entity to administer the loan program.9        (3.5) The State-Authorized Charter School Fund is 10    created as a special fund in the State treasury. Funds 11    appropriated from the General Revenue Fund, the Education 12    Assistance Fund, or the Common School Fund and all moneys 13    received by the State Board from a private source for the 14    purposes of the State-Authorized Charter School Fund shall 15    be deposited into the State-Authorized Charter School 16    Fund, and the moneys in the State-Authorized Charter 17    School Fund shall be used, subject to appropriation, by 18    the State Board for equal distribution among charter 19    schools authorized by the State Board for school expenses. 20    However, moneys from the State-Authorized Charter School 21    Fund may, if needed, be transferred to the General Revenue 22    Fund, the Education Assistance Fund, or the Common School 23    Fund. A school district with a State Board-authorized 24    charter school may not use any funds from its 25    evidence-based funding under Section 18-8.15 for that 26    charter school's expenses. Instead, a school district with   HB5160- 5 -LRB104 17627 LNS 31058 b1    a State Board-authorized charter school must use funds 2    from the State-Authorized Charter School Fund for that 3    charter school's expenses. 4        (4) A charter school may apply for and receive, 5    subject to the same restrictions applicable to school 6    districts, any grant administered by the State Board that 7    is available for school districts.8    If a charter school fails to make payments toward 9administrative costs, the State Board may withhold State funds 10from that school until it has made all payments for those 11costs. 12(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 142026.